Utah statutes.
53A-1-1002.   Creation of State Council on Military Children.

(1)  There is established a State Council on Military Children, as required in Article VIII of Section 53A-1-1001.

(2)  The members of the State Council on Military Children shall include:

(a)  the state superintendent of public instruction;

(b)  a superintendent of a school district with a high concentration of military children appointed by the governor;

(c)  a representative from a military installation, appointed by the governor;

(d)  one member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the speaker of the House;

(e)  one member of the Senate, appointed by the president of the Senate;

(f)  a representative from the Department of Veterans' Affairs, appointed by the governor;

(g)  a military family education liaison, appointed by the members listed in Subsections (2)(a) through (f);

(h)  the compact commissioner, appointed in accordance with Section 53A-1-1003; and

(i)  other members as determined by the governor.

(3)  The State Council on Military Children shall carry out the duties established in Section 53A-1-1001.

(4)  Members may not receive compensation or per diem.

